Utah statutes.
76-10-709.   Presumption of director's knowledge of affairs.

Every director of a corporation or joint stock association is deemed to possess a knowledge of the affairs of his corporation as to enable him to determine whether any act, proceeding, or omission of its directors is a violation of this part.

